District of Columbia statutes.
2-806

Duration of regulations and licenses and publication of regulations.

Regulations prescribed and licenses authorized under this chapter are effective only during the inaugural period. The regulations shall be published in at least one daily newspaper published in the District of Columbia. A penalty prescribed for violating such a regulation may not be enforced until 5 days after publication

History

Aug. 12, 1998, 112 Stat. 1265, Pub. L. 105-225, § 506

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-1056.